kurjmorph/src/foma/fsts/VerbPhonology.foma
define InfinitiveVowelRules [
	  [ î -> i || CT1  "^INF2^" _ n  ]	
	.o. [ i -> î || CT2  "^INF1^" _ n  ]	
	.o. [ i -> î || CT2  "^INF2^" _ n  ]	
];



define DeleteVowelsForInfinitive [
       [ î -> 0 || î["^INF1^"|"^INF2^"] _ n]
   .o. [ î -> 0 || i["^INF1^"|"^INF2^"] _ n]
   .o. [ i -> 0 || i["^INF1^"|"^INF2^"] _ n]
   .o. [ i -> 0 || î["^INF1^"|"^INF2^"] _ n]
   .o. [ e -> 0 || _ ["^INF1^"|"^INF2^"] [i|î] n]
   .o. [ i -> 0 || a  ["^INF1^"|"^INF2^"] _ n]
   .o. [ î -> 0 || a  ["^INF1^"|"^INF2^"] _ n]
];

define DeleteDoubleIForWish [
       [ i -> 0 || [î|i] "^WIBA^" _ b a ]
       .o. [ i -> 0 || [î|i] "^WIBE^" _ b e ]
];

define DeleteIBeforeFutureE [
       [ î -> 0 || _ "^FTRE^" ê ]
];

define ArangeImpPhones [
       [ î -> 0 || _ "^IE^" e ]
       .o. [ î -> e || _ "^IE^" ]
];

define DeleteVowelWIBA [
       [ i -> 0 || [C & ~y]  [a|e] ["^WIBA^"|"^WIBE^"] _ b [a|e] ]
       .o. [ e -> 0 || y _ ["^WIBE^"|"^WIBA^"] i b [e|a] ]
];

define DltVowelsBfrEFTREIE [
       [ a -> 0 || _ ["^FTRE^" | "^IE^"] [ê|e] ]
   .o. [ e -> 0 || _ ["^FTRE^" | "^IE^"] [ê|e] ]
];

define DltUBfrEFTREIE [
       [ û -> 0 || _ "^FTRE^" ê ]
       .o. [ û -> 0 || _ "^IE^" e ]
       .o. [ i -> 0 || û "^WIBA^" _ b a ]
       .o. [ i -> 0 || û "^WIBE^" _ b e ]
       .o. [ {bû} -> 0 || d i "^VPDI^" _ "^WIBA^"  b a ]
       .o. [ {bû} -> 0 || d i "^VPDI^" _ "^WIBE^"  b e ]
];

define DeletePrefixBIE [
       [ i -> 0 ||  b _ "^VPBI^" "^CENE^" ê ]
       .o. [ i -> 0 ||  b _ "^VPBI^" "^CENE^" ê ]
       .o. [ i -> 0 ||  b _ "^VPBI^" "^IENE^" ê ]
];

define DltIBfrEPSNT [
       [ î -> e ||  _ "^PSNTDIPOST^"   ]
       .o. [ û -> e ||  _ "^PSNTDIPOST^"   ]
];


define VerbAndFutureRule [ 
		[  [.a n d.] -> e n e ||  "^VPBI^" VStemRootNoAnd "^CAND^"  _ .#. ]
	 ];

define PhoneticDeletions [
	DltIBfrEPSNT .o. DeleteVowelsForInfinitive .o. DeleteDoubleIForWish .o. DeleteIBeforeFutureE .o. DeletePrefixBIE .o. ArangeImpPhones .o. DeleteVowelWIBA .o. DltVowelsBfrEFTREIE .o. DltUBfrEFTREIE  
];
